Hawaii statutes.
§201B-6 Tourism marketing plan; measures of
effectiveness. (a) The authority shall be responsible for developing a
tourism marketing plan. The plan shall be a single, comprehensive document
that shall be updated every year and include the following:

(1) Statewide Hawaii brand management efforts and
programs;

(2) Targeted markets;

(3) Efforts to enter into Hawaii brand management
projects that make effective use of cooperative programs;

(4) Program performance goals and targets that can be
monitored as market gauges and used as attributes to evaluate the authority's
programs; and

(5) The authority's guidance and direction for the
development and coordination of promotional and marketing programs that build
and promote the Hawaii brand, which are implemented through contracts and
agreements with destination marketing organizations or other qualified
organizations, including:

(A) Target markets and the results being
sought;

(B) Key performance indicators; and

(C) Private sector collaborative or cooperative
efforts that may be required.

As used in this section, "Hawaii
brand" means the programs that collectively differentiate the Hawaii
experience from other destinations.

(b) In accordance with subsection (a), the
authority shall develop measures of effectiveness to assess the overall
benefits and effectiveness of the marketing plan and include documentation of
the progress of the marketing plan towards achieving the authority's strategic
plan goals. [L 1998, c 156, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 178, §7; am L 2004, c 9, §2;
am L Sp 2009, c 5, §6; am L 2010, c 102, §3; am L 2014, c 131, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next